Utah statutes.
31A-42-204.   Powers of commissioner.
(1)  The commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, approve the plan of
operation if the commissioner determines that the plan:
(a)  is consistent with this chapter; and
(b)  is a fair and reasonable administration of the risk adjuster.
(2)  The plan shall be effective upon the adoption of administrative rules by
the commissioner in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act.
(3)  If the board fails to submit a proposed plan of operation by January 1,
2010, or any time thereafter fails to submit proposed amendments to the plan
of operation within a reasonable time after requested by the commissioner, the
commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, adopt such rules as necessary to
effectuate the provisions of this chapter.
(4)  Rules promulgated by the commissioner shall continue in force until
modified by the commissioner or until superseded by a subsequent plan of
operation submitted by the board and approved by the commissioner.
(5)  The commissioner may designate an executive secretary from the department
to provide administrative assistance to the board in carrying out its
responsibilities.
